Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3413
Board; minutes; record; meetings; public records; reports.

(1) The board shall cause minutes and a record to be kept of all its proceedings. Meetings of the board shall be subject to the Open Meetings Act.

(2) All of a land bank's records and documents shall be considered public records for purposes of sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.

(3) The board shall provide a report to the municipality or municipalities that created the land bank on the board's activities pursuant to the Nebraska Municipal Land Bank Act. The report shall be provided after each meeting of the board or at least quarterly. The board shall also electronically submit an annual report to the chairperson of the Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature by March 1 of each year summarizing the board's activities for the prior calendar year.

(4) The annual report required under subsection (3) of this section shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) A listing of each property owned by the land bank at the end of the prior calendar year, including (i) how long each such property has been owned by the land bank, (ii) whether such property was acquired utilizing the automatically accepted bid under section 18-3417 or 18-3418, (iii) whether such property is being held on behalf of a nonprofit corporation or other private entity pursuant to subsection (8) of section 18-3408, and (iv) the intended use of each property being held on behalf of a nonprofit corporation or other private entity pursuant to subsection (8) of section 18-3408;

(b) A list of entities and individuals who received more than two thousand five hundred dollars from the land bank in the prior calendar year;

(c) A list of financial institutions in which the land bank has deposited funds;

(d) The percentage of total parcels located in each municipality which are held by the land bank; and

(e) A statement certifying that all board members and employees of the land bank comply with the conflict of interest requirements in sections 18-3407 and 18-3415.

Laws 2013, LB97, § 13;

Laws 2016, LB699, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,2018, § 19-5213;

Laws 2020, LB424, § 13;

Laws 2026, LB1135, § 19.
July 18, 2026
Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.